Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.160.230

Maintenance and repair of school buses by fire protection districts—Authorized.

The maintenance and repair of school buses may be provided by a fire protection district pursuant to RCW 52.12.031(1).

[ 2019 c 402 s 2.]